Vermont, session 2025-2026, H247.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 16 V.S.A. § 1433 is added to read:
§ 1433. ACUTE CARDIAC EVENTS IN SCHOOLS
(a) Definitions. As used in this section:
(1) “Automated external defibrillator (AED)” has the same meaning as
in 18 V.S.A. § 907(a)(1).
VT LEG #380542 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.247
2025 Page 2 of 4
(2) “Cardiac emergency response plan” means a written document that
establishes the specific steps to reduce death from cardiac arrest in any setting,
including a school, community organization, workplace, or sports facility.
(3) “Sudden cardiac arrest” means the sudden loss of all heart activity
due to an irregular heart rhythm, which if not treated within minutes can
quickly lead to death.
(b) Establishment of a cardiac emergency response plan.
(1) Each school district and independent school shall develop a cardiac
emergency response plan that addresses the appropriate use of school
personnel to respond to incidents involving an individual experiencing sudden
cardiac arrest or a similar life-threatening emergency while on school grounds.
(2) Each school district and approved independent school with an
athletic department or organized athletic program shall develop a cardiac
emergency response plan that addresses the appropriate use of school
personnel to respond to incidents involving an individual experiencing sudden
cardiac arrest or a similar life-threatening emergency while attending or
participating in an athletic practice or event while on school grounds.
(3) School officials shall work directly with local emergency service
providers to integrate the cardiac emergency response plan into the
community’s emergency medical service responder protocols. Each plan shall
integrate evidence-based core elements, such as those recommended by the
VT LEG #380542 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.247
2025 Page 3 of 4
American Heart Association guidelines or another nationally recognized,
evidence-based standard.
(c) Plan requirements. The cardiac emergency response plan shall include,
at a minimum, policies on:
(1) establishment of a cardiac emergency response team;
(2) guidelines for when a team is activated in response to a sudden
cardiac event;
(3) implementation of AED placement and routine maintenance within
the school;
(4) dissemination of the plan throughout the school campus;
(5) maintaining ongoing staff training in CPR and AED use;
(6) practice drills;
(7) integrating local EMS with the plan; and
(8) ongoing and annual review and evaluation of the plan.
(d) AED placement. Appropriate AED placement shall be dictated by the
cardiac emergency response plan and in accordance with guidelines set by the
American Heart Association.
(e) Training. Appropriate school staff shall be trained in first-aid, CPR,
and AED use that follow evidence-based guidelines set forth by the American
Heart Association. Staff trained shall be determined by the cardiac emergency
response plan, including licensed coaches, school nurses, and athletic trainers.
VT LEG #380542 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.247
2025 Page 4 of 4
Sec. 2. IMPLEMENTATION
School districts and independent schools shall have a cardiac emergency
response plan developed and ready for implementation beginning in the 2025–
2026 school year.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #380542 v.2